Florida, session 2026, HB831.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 43.51, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
43.51 Problem-solving court reports.—
(1) The Office of the State Courts Administrator shall
provide an annual report to the President of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives which details the number
of participants in each problem-solving court for each fiscal
year the court has been operating and the types of services
provided, identifies each source of funding for each court
during each fiscal year, and provides information on the
performance of each court based upon outcome measures
established by the courts. The report shall, at a minimum,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb831-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 831 2026
include uniform aggregate data regarding:
(a) The number of participants by court type.
(b) Participant primary offenses that resulted in the
court program referral or sentence, treatment compliance,
completion status and reasons for failure to complete, offenses
committed during treatment and the sanctions imposed, frequency
of court appearances, and units of service.
(c) Participant recidivism rate by category, including new
arrests, new adjudications, and new felony adjudications.
(d) Participant changes in the status of employment,
housing, and child custody during program participation.
(e) Other uniform information that demonstrates the
effectiveness of the program.
Section 2. Paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of section
394.47892, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
394.47892 Mental health court programs.—
(5)
(b) Each mental health court program shall collect
sufficient client-level data and programmatic information for
purposes of program evaluation under s. 43.51. Client-level data
includes primary offenses that resulted in the mental health
court program referral or sentence, treatment compliance,
completion status and reasons for failure to complete, offenses
committed during treatment and the sanctions imposed, frequency
of court appearances, and units of service. Programmatic
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb831-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 831 2026
information includes referral and screening procedures,
eligibility criteria, type and duration of treatment offered,
and residential treatment resources. The programmatic
information and aggregate data on the number of mental health
court program admissions and terminations by type of termination
shall be reported at least quarterly annually by each mental
health court program to the Office of the State Courts
Administrator.
Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section
397.334, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
397.334 Treatment-based drug court programs.—
(6)
(b) Each treatment-based drug court program shall collect
sufficient client-level data and programmatic information for
purposes of program evaluation under s. 43.51. Client-level data
includes primary offenses that resulted in the treatment-based
drug court program referral or sentence, treatment compliance,
completion status and reasons for failure to complete, offenses
committed during treatment and the sanctions imposed, frequency
of court appearances, and units of service. Programmatic
information includes referral and screening procedures,
eligibility criteria, type and duration of treatment offered,
and residential treatment resources. Each treatment-based drug
court program must annually report at least quarterly the
programmatic information and aggregate data on the number of
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb831-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 831 2026
treatment-based drug court program admissions and terminations
by type of termination to the Office of the State Courts
Administrator.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb831-00